District of Columbia statutes.
32-1305

Provisions of law may not be waived.

(a)

Except as herein provided, no provision of this chapter shall in any way be contravened or set aside by private agreement.

(b)

In enforcing the provisions of this chapter, the remuneration promised by an employer to an employee shall be presumed to be at least the amount required by federal law, including federal law requiring the payment of prevailing wages, or by District law.

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 977, ch. 924, § 5
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 2062(c), 60 DCR 12472
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
Section 2061 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle G of Title II of the act may be cited as the “Wage Theft Prevention Amendment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2062(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2062(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added (b).
1973 Ed., § 36-605.
1981 Ed., § 36-105.